North Carolina, session 2025, HB974.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct a study
to examine ways to improve the responsiveness of hospice care facilities to complaints by hospice
care patients and their families. In conducting this study, the Department shall analyze complaint
data collected from hospice care facilities, hospice care patients, and families of hospice care
patients. In addition, the Department shall engage stakeholders, including hospice care
administrators and representatives of North Carolina associations supporting hospice care
facilities such as the Association for Home and Hospice Care of North Carolina. The Department
shall report its findings and recommendations, including any legislative or administrative
proposals, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the
Fiscal Research Division by April 1, 2026. The report shall include, at a minimum, a summary
of the most common complaints by hospice care patients and their families and recommendations
on best practices for hospice care facilities to implement clear and accessible patient complaint
procedures, ensure timely and thorough investigations of patient complaints, foster open and
effective communication with hospice care patients and their families regarding patient
complaints, and empower families as active members of the care team.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H974-v-1*